Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.130

Other provisions not superseded.

The provisions of RCW * 42.56.070 (7) and (8) and 42.56.120 that establish or allow agencies to establish the costs charged for photocopies or electronically produced copies of public records do not supersede other statutory provisions, other than in this chapter, authorizing or governing fees for copying public records.

[ 2017 c 304 s 4; 2005 c 274 s 286; 1995 c 341 s 3. Formerly RCW 42.17.305.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 42.56.070 was amended by 2017 c 304 s 1, deleting subsection (8).